Utah statutes.
39-7-105.   Stay of proceedings.
(1)  If at any point during an action or proceeding it appears that a
plaintiff or defendant is a service member and in the conduct of the
proceedings may be adversely affected by his military service, the court may,
on its own motion, stay the proceedings.
(2)  The court may stay the proceedings if the service member or another
person on his behalf makes a request in writing to the court, unless the court
determines on the record that the ability of the plaintiff to pursue the
action or the defendant to conduct his defense is not materially affected by
reason of his military service.
